Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.670

Bureau of forensic laboratory services—Powers—Priorities.

(1) There is created in the Washington state patrol a bureau of forensic laboratory services system which is authorized to:

(a) Provide laboratory services for the purpose of analyzing and scientifically handling any physical evidence relating to any crime.

(b) Provide training assistance for local law enforcement personnel.

(c) Provide all necessary toxicology services requested by all coroners, medical examiners, and prosecuting attorneys.

(2) The bureau of forensic laboratory services shall assign priority to a request for services with due regard to whether the case involves criminal activity against persons. The Washington state forensic investigations council shall assist the bureau of forensic laboratory services in devising policies to promote the most efficient use of laboratory services consistent with this section. The forensic investigations council shall be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget and shall approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget prior to its formal submission by the state patrol to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

[ 1999 c 40 s 6; 1995 c 398 s 1; 1980 c 69 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 40: See note following RCW 43.103.010.